South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: South Carolina veterans' homes SECTION 1.    Chapter 11, Title 25 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 25-11-730.    (A) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall adopt and execute criteria, policies, and procedures for admissions to and discharges from South Carolina veterans' homes. (B) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall set and collect fees for residence in and services provided by South Carolina veterans' homes. (C) The Department of Veterans' Affairs is authorized to receive, as full or partial payment of any fees charged by a South Carolina veteran home, the assignment of any state or federal benefit. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________